apertium-pl-csb.csb.dix
    <pardef n="Marij/ô__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ô</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ô</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Britanij/ô__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ô</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ô</l>
          <r>ô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Pòls/kô__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kô</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czi</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kã</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ką</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kô</l>
          <r>kô<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="òjc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="inżinér__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>owi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ã</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ze</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>óm</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ów</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ama</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ach</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ë</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>owie</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="inżinér"><i>inżinér</i><par n="inżinér__n"/></e>
    <e lm="òjc"><i>òjc</i><par n="òjc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Pòlskô"><i>Pòls</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Ruskô"><i>Rus</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Szpańskô"><i>Szpańs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lëtewskô"><i>Lëtews</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Norweskô"><i>Norwes</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Estóńskô"><i>Estóńs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Miemieckô"><i>Miemiec</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Słowackô"><i>Słowac</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tëreckô"><i>Tërec</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Czeskô"><i>Czes</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Aùstrëjackô"><i>Aùstrëjac</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Chòrwackô"><i>Chòrwac</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Belgijskô"><i>Belgijs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Biôłorëskô"><i>Biôłorës</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pòmòrskô"><i>Pòmòrs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Anielskô"><i>Aniels</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Szwedzkô"><i>Szwedz</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Dëńskô"><i>Dëńs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Szwajcarskô"><i>Szwajcars</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Albańskô"><i>Albańs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Fińskô"><i>Fińs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Greckô"><i>Grec</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Luksembùrskô"><i>Luksembùrs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Lëtewskô"><i>Lëtews</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Macedońskô"><i>Macedońs</i><par n="Pòls/kô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Britanijô"><i>Britanij</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Pòmòranijô"><i>Pòmòranij</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Skandinawijô"><i>Skandinawij</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Czechosłowacëjô"><i>Czechosłowacëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Aùstralëjô"><i>Aùstralëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Aùstralëjô" r="LR"><p><l>Australëj</l><r>Aùstralëj</r></p><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Azëjô"><i>Azëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Wenecëjô"><i>Wenecëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Tërcëjô"><i>Tërcëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Szwëcëjô"><i>Szwëcëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Słowacëjô"><i>Słowacëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Francëjô"><i>Francëj</i><par n="Britanij/ô__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Marijô"><i>Marij</i><par n="Marij/ô__np"/></e>
